Maryland, session 2026, HB1304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–604.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1304*

HOUSE BILL 1304
(b) Any person 16 years old or older shall secure an angler’s license to fish in the
nontidal waters of the State. An angler’s license entitles the holder to fish in the nontidal
waters of the State only during the open season.
4–701.
(a) Except as provided in §§ 4–701.1 and 4–701.2 of this subtitle, this section
applies to any person who is required under this subtitle or Subtitle 2, 8, 9, or 10 of this
title to be licensed to guide fishing parties or to catch, sell, buy, process, transport, export,
or otherwise deal in fish caught in tidal waters.
(b) (1) Except as provided in §§ 4–701.1 and 4–701.2 of this subtitle, the
Department shall utilize a single, commercial license, to be known and designated as a tidal
fish license.
4–745.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and § 4–217
of this title, a person may not fish for finfish in the Chesapeake Bay or in its tributaries up
to tidal boundaries or in State waters of the Atlantic Ocean and the Atlantic coastal bays
and their tributaries without first obtaining a Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing
license or registration issued under subsection (d)(3) of this section and possessing the
license or registration.
4–1201.
(I) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED UNDER THIS
TITLE, IF A PERSON CHARGED WITH COMMERCIALLY OR RECREATIONALLY FISHING
WITHOUT A LICENSE HELD THE APPROPRIATE COMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL
FISHING LICENSE IN THE PREVIOUS LICENSE YEAR AND FAILED TO RENEW THE
COMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL FISHING LICENSE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUSPEND THE PERSON’S COMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL FISHING PRIVILEGES, AS
APPROPRIATE:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, FOR 1 MONTH;
(II) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, FOR 6 MONTHS; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, FOR 1 YEAR.
(2) (I) A PERSON WHOSE COMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL
FISHING PRIVILEGES ARE SUSPENDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY APPLY FOR A
NEW LICENSE DURING THE TERM OF SUSPENSION.

HOUSE BILL 1304 3
(II) IF THE DEPARTMENT ISSUES A NEW LICENSE TO THE
PERSON, THAT LICENSE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ANY REMAINING TIME ON THE
SUSPENSION OF THE PERSON’S FISHING PRIVILEGES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AN ORAL OR WRITTEN NOTICE
OF THE NATURE OF THE VIOLATION AND OF THE PENALTIES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
VIOLATION TO A PERSON WHO IS CHARGED WITH FISHING WITHOUT A COMMERCIAL
OR RECREATIONAL FISHING LICENSE AND FAILED TO RENEW THE APPROPRIATE
COMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL FISHING LICENSE IN THE PREVIOUS LICENSE
YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 4–1201(i)(1) and (2) of the
Natural Resources Article, as enacted by this Act, shall be construed to apply retroactively
and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any person charged with commercially or
recreationally fishing without a license on or after September 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.